Utah statutes.
7-1-705.   Approval required for certain transactions -- Application --
Grounds for disapproval.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (5), an applicant for authorization to
engage in any of the transactions described in Sections 7-1-702 and 7-1-703
shall file with the commissioner:
(a)  an application in a form prescribed by the commissioner;
(b)  the fee prescribed for the transaction by the commissioner;
(c)  other information that is required by rule, or that the commissioner
considers necessary to make the findings required by Subsection (3); and
(d)  if the applicant is not a Utah resident, a Utah corporation, or an out-
of-state corporation qualified to do business in this state, a written consent
to service of process on a resident of this state in any action or suit
arising out of or connected with the proposed action.
(2) (a)  Within 60 days of acceptance of the application as complete, the
commissioner shall respond to the application by writing the commissioner's
findings of fact, conclusions, and order.
(b)  The commissioner may approve an application subject to the terms and
conditions  the commissioner considers necessary to protect the public
interest and carry out the purposes of this title.
(c)  The commissioner may defer acceptance of the application as complete
until the applicant has provided any information the commissioner considers
necessary to decide whether to approve or deny the application.
(3)  The commissioner may disapprove any application filed under this section
if  the commissioner finds that:
(a)  the proposed transaction would be detrimental to the safety and soundness
of the applicant, to any institution that is a party to the transaction, or to
a subsidiary or affiliate of that institution;
(b)  the applicant, its executive officers, directors, or principal
stockholders have not established a record of sound performance, efficient
management, financial responsibility, and integrity so that it would be
against the interest of the depositors, other customers, creditors, or
shareholders of an institution, or the public to authorize the proposed
transaction;
(c)  the financial condition of the applicant or any other institution that is
a participant in the proposed transaction might jeopardize the financial
stability of the applicant or other institution, or prejudice the interests of
depositors or other customers of the applicant or other institutions;
(d)  the consummation of the proposed transaction will tend to substantially
lessen competition, unless the commissioner finds that the anticompetitive
effects of the proposed transaction are clearly outweighed by the benefit of
meeting the convenience and needs of the relevant market area to be served;
(e)  the applicant has not established a record of meeting the credit needs of
the communities that it or its subsidiary depository institution serves; or
(f)  in the case of an interstate transaction, the applicant fails to obtain
any required approval from a federal or state agency with regulatory authority
over any of the institutions participating in the transaction.
(4)  In the case of an interstate transaction, the commissioner may accept an
application in the form and manner prescribed by the state or federal agency
that primarily regulates the applicant, supplemented as necessary to enable
the commissioner to decide whether to approve or deny the application.
(5) (a)  The following branching activities, if they do not involve a merger
or acquisition, are not subject to the requirements of this section, but are
subject to Section 7-1-708:
(i)  the establishment of a branch in Utah or another state by an out-of-state
depository institution with a previously established branch in Utah; and
(ii)  the establishment of a branch in another state by a Utah depository
institution.
(b)  Other interstate branching activities are subject to the requirements of
both this section and Section 7-1-708.
